sk-SK: Veľkosť ušných koncoviek: Extra veľký (XL); Extra malý (XS); Veľký (L); Stredný (M); Malý (S); Iné
nb: Øreproppstørrelse: Ekstra stor (XL); Ekstra liten (XS); Stor (L); Middels (M); Liten (S); Annet
da: Størrelse på øreprop: XL; XS; Large (L); Medium (M); Small (S); Andet
nl: Oordopje grootte: Extra groot (XL); Extra klein (XS); Groot (L); Middel (M); Klein (S); Andere
it: Taglia del gommino auricolare: Extra large (XL); Extra small (XS); Large (L); Medium (M); Small (S); Altro
el: Μέγεθος άκρου ακουστικού: Extra large (XL); Extra small (XS); Large (L); Medium (M); Small (S); Άλλο
ro-RO: Mărime dop auricular: Extra large (XL); Extra small (XS); Large (L); Medium (M); Small (S); Altele
lt-LT: Ausies antgalio dydis: Itin didelis (XL); Itin mažas (XS); Didelis (L); Vidutinis (M); Mažas (S); Kita
zh-TW: 耳塞尺寸: 特大號 (XL); 特小號 (XS); 大號 (L); 中號（M）; 小 (S); 其他
hu: Fülilleszték mérete: Extra nagy (XL); Extra kicsi (XS); Nagy (L); Közepes (M); Kicsi (S); Egyéb
en: Ear tip size: Extra large (XL); Extra small (XS); Large (L); Medium (M); Small (S); Other
tr: Kulaklık ucu boyutu: X large (XL); X small (XS); Large (L); Medium (M); Small (S); Diğer
hr-HR: Veličina nastavka za uho: Ekstra veliko (XL); Ekstra malo (XS); Veliko (L); Srednje (M); Malo (S); Ostalo
fi: Korvatyynyn koko: Erittäin suuri (XL); Erittäin pieni (XS); Suuri (L); Keskikokoinen (M); Pieni (S); Muu
pl: Rozmiar końcówki dousznej: Extra large (XL); Extra small (XS); Large (L); Medium (M); Small (S); Inne
pt-BR: Tamanho da ponta auricular: Extra grande (XG); Extra pequeno (XP); Grande (G); Médio (M); Pequeno (P); Outro
vi: Kích thước đầu tai nghe: Rất lớn (XL); Rất nhỏ (XS); Lớn (L); Trung bình (M); Nhỏ (S); Khác
ko: 이어 팁 크기: XL(XL); XS(XS); 라지(L); 미디엄(M); 스몰(S); 기타
th: ขนาดจุกหู: ขนาดใหญ่พิเศษ (XL); ขนาดเล็กพิเศษ (XS); ขนาดใหญ่ (L); ขนาดกลาง (M); ขนาดเล็ก (S); อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Velikost ušesnih nastavkov: Ekstra velika (XL); Ekstra majhna (XS); Velika (L); Srednja (M); Majhna (S); Drugo
bg-BG: Размер на накрайника за уши: Екстра голямо (XL); Екстра малко (XS); Голямо (L); Средно (M); Малко (S); Други
cs: Velikost ušního nástavce: Velmi velké (XL); Velmi malé (XS); Velké (L); Střední (M); Malé (S); Jiné
es: Tamaño de la almohadilla auricular: Extragrande (XL); Extrapequeño (XS); Grande (L); Mediano (M); Pequeño (S); Otros
zh-CN: 耳塞尺寸: 特大号 (XL); 特小号 (XS); 大号 (L); 中号 (M); 小号 (S); 其他
ja: イヤーチップサイズ: エクストララージ (XL); エクストラスモール (XS); ラージ (L); ミディアム (M); スモール (S); その他
pt-PT: Tamanho da ponta auricular: Extra grande (XL); Extra pequeno (XS); Grande (L); Médio (M); Pequeno (S); Outro
ru: Размер амбушюров: Очень большой (XL); Очень маленький (XS); Большой (L); Средний (М); Маленький (S); Другой
sv: Öronproppsstorlek: Extra large (XL); Extra small (XS); Large (L); Medium (M); Small (S); Övrigt
de: Ohrpassstückgröße: XL; XS; L; M; S; Sonstiges
fr: Taille de l’embout auriculaire: Extra large (XL); Très petite taille (XS); Taille large (L); Taille moyenne (M); Petite taille (S); Autre